District of Columbia statutes.
42-3113

Interpretation.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in accordance with its remedial purposes. The definition of a drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance shall not be subject to any restrictions or limitations upon public or private nuisance actions at common law. This action is civil in nature and none of its provisions should be interpreted as punishment.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 14, 45 DCR 7982
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-81, § 3(b), 53 DCR 1050
Nov. 6, 2010, D.C. Law 18-259, § 7(b), 57 DCR 5591

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-3313.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-81 substituted “drug or prostitution-related” for “drug-related”.
D.C. Law 18-259 substituted “drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related” for “drug or prostitution-related”.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.